Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.060

Notice of hearing on budget.

The county legislative authority shall then publish a notice stating that it has completed and placed on file its preliminary budget for the county for the ensuing fiscal year, a copy of which will be furnished any citizen who will call at its office for it, and that it will meet on the first Monday in October thereafter for the purpose of fixing the final budget and making tax levies, designating the time and place of the meeting, and that any taxpayer may appear thereat and be heard for or against any part of the budget. The notice shall be published once each week for two consecutive weeks immediately following adoption of the preliminary budget in the official newspaper of the county. The county legislative authority shall provide a sufficient number of copies of the detailed and comparative preliminary budget to meet the reasonable demands of taxpayers therefor and the same shall be available for distribution not later than two weeks immediately preceding the first Monday in October.

[ 1985 c 469 s 47; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.060. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 3, part; RRS s 3997-3, part.]